District of Columbia statutes.
9-1203.09

Right to alter, amend, or repeal this subchapter.

The right to alter, amend, or repeal this subchapter is reserved without regard to any payments required or agreements established under their terms.

History

June 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 324, ch. 269, § 9

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1424.
1973 Ed., § 1224.